Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
UNIFORM RENDITION OF ACCUSED PERSONS ACT

16-4-301. Short title.

This part 3 shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Rendition of Accused Persons Act", and shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 213, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-304.

16-4-302. Arrest of person illegally in state.

If a person who has been charged with crime in another state and released from custody prior to final judgment, including the final disposition of any appeal, is alleged to have violated the terms and conditions of his release, and is present in this state, a designated agent of the court, judge, or magistrate who authorized the release may request the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person and an order authorizing his return to the demanding court, judge, or magistrate. Before the warrant is issued, the designated agent shall file with the judge of a court of record of this state the following documents:

An affidavit stating the name and whereabouts of the person whose return is sought, the crime with which the person was charged, the time and place of the crime charged, and the status of the proceedings against him; and

A certified copy of the order or other document specifying the terms and conditions under which the person was released from custody; and

A certified copy of an order of the demanding judge, court, or magistrate stating the manner in which the terms and conditions of the release have been violated and designating the affiant its agent for seeking the return of the person.

Upon initially determining that the affiant is a designated agent of the demanding judge, court, or magistrate, and that there is probable cause for believing that the person whose return is sought has violated the terms and conditions of his release, the judge of this state shall issue a warrant to a peace officer of this state for the person's arrest.

The judge of this state shall notify the district attorney of his action and shall direct him to investigate the case and to ascertain the validity of the affidavits and documents required by subsection (1) of this section and the identity and authority of the affiant.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 211, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-301.

16-4-303. Hearing and right to counsel.

The person whose return is sought shall be brought before the judge of this state immediately upon arrest pursuant to the warrant; whereupon the judge shall set a time and place for hearing and shall advise the person of his right to have the assistance of counsel, to confront the witnesses against him, and to produce evidence in his own behalf at the hearing.

The person whose return is sought may at this time in writing waive the hearing and agree to be returned to the demanding court, judge, or magistrate. If a waiver is executed, the judge shall issue an order pursuant to section 16-4-304.

The judge may impose conditions of release authorized by the laws of this state which will reasonably assure the appearance at the hearing of the person whose return is sought.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 212, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-302.

16-4-304. Order of return to demanding court.

The district attorney shall appear at the hearing and report to the judge the results of his investigation. If the judge finds that the affiant is a designated agent of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate, and that the person whose return is sought was released from custody by the demanding court, judge, or magistrate, and that the person has violated the terms or conditions of his release, the judge shall issue an order authorizing the return of the person to the custody of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate forthwith.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 212, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-4-303.